Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Interstate Racing and Wagering Compact
230.377.
Award of simulcasting and intertrack wagering dates.

Other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, a track may apply to the racing commission for simulcasting and intertrack wagering dates. Applications shall be submitted in accordance with KRS

230.300

. The racing commission shall not approve the establishment or relocation of a receiving track within a radius of seventy-five (75) miles of a race track duly licensed as of July 15, 1992, without the prior written consent of the licensed track within whose seventy-five (75) mile radius the new receiving track would be located.

On or before November 1 of each year, the racing commission shall meet and award intertrack wagering dates to all tracks for the entire succeeding calendar year. In a geographic area containing more than one (1) track within a fifty (50) mile radius of another track, intertrack wagering, except for quarter horse racing, shall be limited to simulcasting and wagering on racing of the same breed of horse as the receiving track was licensed to race on or before July 15, 1998.

The racing commission shall approve no more than nine (9) tracks for participation in horse racing, intertrack wagering, and simulcasting. Any approval by the racing commission of a change in location of these tracks shall be subject to the local-approval process contained in KRS

230.380

.

A track may by administrative regulation be required to simulcast its races to one (1) or more receiving tracks approved for simulcasting and intertrack wagering, as a prerequisite for the issuance of a license pursuant to KRS

230.300

, provided that:

Each track shall be permitted to exempt one (1) day of racing from simulcasting to both receiving tracks and simulcast facilities, at its discretion;

Tracks in a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government and tracks in an urban-county government shall not be required to simulcast to each other or to any other facility in those counties. This provision shall not be construed as requiring tracks within the same county to simulcast to each other; and

In the absence of a contract between a host track and a receiving track, the commission shall be split as provided for in KRS 230.378(3).

A track may receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering thereon subject to the following limitations which shall be in addition to the limitations set forth in KRS

230.3771

:

A track licensed to conduct Thoroughbred racing may receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering on all Thoroughbred horse races designated as graded stakes races by the Graded Stakes Committee of the Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Inc., without further consents or approvals.

A track licensed to conduct harness racing may receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering on all harness horse races (both final and elimination) having a final purse in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) without further consents or approvals.

A track licensed to conduct quarter horse racing may receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering on all quarter horse races designated as graded stakes races by the graded stakes committee of the American Quarter Horse Association, without further consents or approvals.

A track which applies to the racing commission to receive an interstate race of a different breed than the breed for which it is licensed by the racing commission shall receive any simulcast of an interstate race through the intertrack wagering system upon approval by the racing commission. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a track licensed to conduct horse racing may receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering on quarter horse races, subject to the limitations of KRS

230.3771

.

A track may receive simulcasts of special event races conducted in other states or foreign countries which are determined by the racing commission to be of sufficient national or international significance or interest to warrant interstate wagering and if the simulcast of these races has been approved by the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Inc., the Kentucky Division of the Horseman’s Benevolent and Protective Association, for Thoroughbred races, and the Kentucky Harness Horsemen’s Association for harness racing, and any track conducting live horse races of the same breed at the same time as the simulcast race.

A track may also receive simulcasts and conduct interstate wagering on Thoroughbred horse races other than those described in paragraphs (a) and (e) of this subsection if the simulcast of these races has been approved by the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Inc., and the Kentucky Horsemen’s Benevolent and Protective Association, for Thoroughbred races, and the Kentucky Harness Horsemen’s Association, or its successor, for harness racing.

The consent required by paragraph (f) of this subsection or by subsections (1)(g) and (2)(g) of KRS 230.3771 shall not be withheld:

For any reason not specifically related to financial harm to live horse racing; or

As a condition to the granting of any contractual or other concession not specifically related to the effects of interstate simulcasting on live horse racing in this Commonwealth, taken as a whole.

A host track located in this state may receive simulcasting of not more than two (2) full cards of racing from another state, if both tracks race horses of the same breed and if:

The race date was previously granted by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to conduct live racing at the track located in this state;

Live racing was canceled due to weather conditions; and

The consent required by paragraph (e) of this subsection is obtained.

The in-state track receiving the simulcast specified in paragraph (h) of this subsection shall offer that simulcast to all participating tracks and simulcast facilities in the intertrack wagering system.

All interstate simulcasting shall be conducted in accordance with applicable federal laws.

The racing commission may promulgate necessary and reasonable administrative regulations for the purpose of administering the conduct of intertrack or interstate wagering and regulating the conditions under which wagering shall be held and conducted. Administrative regulations shall provide for the prevention of practices detrimental to the public interest and to impose penalties for violations. All administrative regulations shall be in conformity with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, KRS

138.510

, and this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 376, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 159, § 7, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 28, effective March 30, 1992; 1994, ch. 438, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 212, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 104, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 191, § 32, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 476, effective July 15, 2010.

230.3771.
Limitations on and conditions for interstate simulcasting and wagering at Thoroughbred tracks, harness tracks, and simulcast facilities.

A Thoroughbred track licensed to conduct Thoroughbred racing may receive interstate simulcasts of Thoroughbred, quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races, and conduct interstate wagering thereon, subject to the following limitations:

A Thoroughbred receiving track may receive interstate simulcasts of Thoroughbred races and conduct interstate wagering thereon at any time of day and during any live Thoroughbred horse race meet conducted in the Commonwealth of Kentucky so long as the Thoroughbred receiving track conducting interstate wagering remits to the Thoroughbred host track conducting a live meet, from the first awarded day of its live meet through the last awarded day of the same live meet, the amounts provided in paragraph (j) of this subsection.

A Thoroughbred host track which receives interstate simulcasts and conducts interstate wagering thereon during the period of time from the first awarded day of its live meet through the last awarded day of its live meet shall offer the simulcasts to all Thoroughbred receiving tracks, all harness tracks not subject to the provisions of KRS 230.377(2), and all simulcast facilities through the intertrack wagering system.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a receiving track shall conduct intertrack wagering on all live races of all Thoroughbred host tracks on any day on which it receives an interstate simulcast for the purpose of conducting interstate wagering.

No host track shall require that any receiving track or simulcast facility receive the interstate simulcast.

If more than one (1) Thoroughbred track conducts live racing at the same time on the same day, no track or simulcast facility may receive an interstate simulcast of Thoroughbred races unless all Thoroughbred tracks conducting live racing at the same time of day agree upon all interstate simulcasts to be received and the division of the Thoroughbred host track’s commission. If more than one (1) Thoroughbred track conducts live racing at different times on the same day, the Thoroughbred host track with the highest average daily handle, based on the preceding year, shall be the host track for purposes of splitting the commissions earned on interstate wagering at receiving tracks within the Commonwealth. For purposes of this subsection, average daily handle includes live handle, intertrack wagering handle, and simulcast facility handle. Also for purposes of this subsection, the time of day during which a host track conducts live racing commences with its first published post time and concludes ten (10) minutes after the published post time of its last race of the day, regardless of actual post times.

Each Thoroughbred track which desires to conduct interstate wagering pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall during each year make application to the racing commission for no less than one hundred percent (100%) of the number of racing days awarded to the track in 1994 and one hundred percent (100%) of the number of races scheduled to be run by the track in 1993.

Notwithstanding paragraph (f) of this subsection, any Thoroughbred track may apply for less than one hundred percent (100%) of the number of racing days awarded to the track in 1994 or one hundred percent (100%) of the number of races scheduled to be run by the track in 1993, if written approval is obtained from the Kentucky Horsemen’s Benevolent and Protective Association and the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Inc.

A separate accounting on all interstate simulcasting shall be submitted to the racing commission. The accounting shall be submitted in the same format and at the same time that the report for intertrack wagering is submitted.

If the only simulcast or simulcasts a track participating as a host track makes available for interstate wagering through this state’s intertrack wagering system on any race day are Thoroughbred horse races designated as graded stakes races by the Graded Stakes Committee of the Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Inc., then the commission of the receiving track on these interstate wagers shall be split as prescribed by KRS 230.378(3); otherwise, the commission of the receiving track shall be split as prescribed by paragraph (j) of this subsection. Interstate simulcasts received by a Thoroughbred host track under the conditions set forth in this paragraph shall not be subject to the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b), (c), (e), and (f) of this subsection.

A receiving track’s commission on interstate wagering, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amounts required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the Thoroughbred host track designated by paragraphs (a) and (e) of this subsection. However, if the race does not occur between the first awarded day of a live meet and the last awarded day of the same live meet, an additional twenty-five percent (25%) shall be retained by the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the Thoroughbred host track designated by paragraphs (a) and (e) of this subsection. However, if the race does not occur between the first awarded day of a live meet and the last awarded day of the same live meet, then an additional twenty-five percent (25%) shall be paid to the purse program of the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs.

A simulcast facility’s commission on interstate wagering on Thoroughbred racing, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amounts required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as provided in KRS 230.380(9).

A harness track licensed to conduct harness racing may receive interstate simulcasts of harness horse, quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon subject to the following limitations:

A harness receiving track may receive interstate simulcasts of harness races, quarter horse races, paint horse races, Appaloosa races, and Arabian horse races, and conduct interstate wagering thereon at any time of day and during the course of any live harness horse race meet conducted in the Commonwealth of Kentucky so long as the harness receiving track conducting interstate wagering remits to the harness host track conducting a live meet, from the first awarded day of its live meet through the last awarded day of the same live meet, the amounts provided in paragraph (j) of this subsection.

A harness host track which receives an interstate simulcast and conducts interstate wagering thereon during its live race meet shall offer the simulcasts to all Thoroughbred receiving tracks not subject to the provisions of KRS 230.377(2), all harness tracks, and all simulcast facilities through the intertrack wagering system.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a harness receiving track or a simulcast facility shall conduct intertrack wagering on all live races of a harness host track on any day it receives an interstate simulcast from a harness host track.

No host track shall require that any receiving track or simulcast facility receive the interstate simulcast.

If more than one (1) harness track conducts live racing at the same time on the same day, no track or simulcast facility may receive an interstate simulcast on harness races unless all harness tracks conducting live racing at that time of day agree upon the interstate simulcast to be received and the division of the harness host track’s commission. If more than one (1) harness track conducts live racing at different times on the same day, the harness host track with the highest average daily handle, based on the preceding year, shall be the host track for purposes of splitting the commissions earned on interstate wagering at receiving tracks within the Commonwealth. For purposes of this subsection, average daily handle includes live handle, intertrack wagering handle, and simulcast facility handle. Also for purposes of this subsection, the time of day during which a host track conducts live racing commences with its first published post time and conclude ten (10) minutes after the published post time of its last race of the day, regardless of actual post times.

Each harness track which desires to conduct interstate wagering pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall during each year make application to the racing commission for no less than one hundred percent (100%) of the number of racing days awarded to the track in 1994 and one hundred percent (100%) of the number of races scheduled to be run by the track in 1993.

Notwithstanding paragraph (f) of this subsection, any harness track may apply for less than one hundred percent (100%) of the number of racing days awarded to the track in 1994 or one hundred percent (100%) of the number of races scheduled to be run by the track in 1993, if written approval is obtained from the Kentucky Harness Horsemen’s Association, or its successor.

A separate accounting on all interstate simulcasting shall be submitted to the racing commission. This accounting shall be submitted in the same format and at the same time that the report for intertrack wagering is submitted.

If the only simulcast or simulcasts a track participating as a harness host track makes available for interstate wagering through this state’s intertrack wagering system on any race day are harness horse races (both final and elimination) having a final purse in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), then the commission of the receiving track on these interstate wagers shall be split as prescribed by KRS 230.378(3); otherwise, the commission of the receiving track shall be split as prescribed by paragraph (j) of this subsection. Interstate simulcasts received by a harness host track under the conditions set forth in this paragraph shall not be subject to the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b), (c), (e), and (f) of this subsection.

A receiving track’s commission on interstate wagering, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amounts required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the harness host track designated by paragraphs (a) and (e) of this subsection. However, if no live meet is occurring, an additional twenty-five percent (25%) shall be retained by the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the harness host track designated by paragraphs (a) and (e) of this subsection. However, if no live meet is occurring, an additional twenty-five percent (25%) shall be paid to the purse program of the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs.

A simulcast facility’s commission on interstate wagering on harness races, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amount required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as provided in KRS 230.380(9).

A harness track may only receive interstate simulcasts of Thoroughbred horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section. A Thoroughbred track may only receive interstate simulcasts of harness horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section. A simulcast facility may only receive interstate simulcasts of Thoroughbred and harness horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (2)(b) of this section.

A Thoroughbred track licensed to conduct horse racing may receive interstate simulcasts of quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon, subject to the limitations stated in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

A receiving track’s commission on interstate wagering, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amounts required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the receiving track where the interstate wagering occurs;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the host track; and

Fifty percent (50%) to the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund established by KRS

230.446

to supplement purses for quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races in this state.

A harness track licensed to conduct horse racing may receive interstate simulcasts of quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races and conduct interstate wagering thereon, subject to the limitations stated in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.

A receiving track’s commission on interstate wagering, after deduction of applicable taxes and any amounts required to be paid by contract to the track from which the interstate simulcast originated, shall be split as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the receiving track;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the purse program of the host track;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the receiving track; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the host track.

When a quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse race is run at a Kentucky race track, the commission to the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund established by KRS

230.446

shall be twenty-two percent (22%) from the host track’s purse share.

Other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, any track in a geographic area that contains more than one (1) track within a fifty (50) mile radius of any other track may only receive interstate simulcasts on racing of the same breed of horse as the track was licensed to race on or before July 15, 1998, except any track may receive interstate simulcasts on quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse races.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 438, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 245, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 104, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 191, § 33, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 477, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 57, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 21, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 47, § 6, effective June 24, 2015.

230.3773.
Interstate common wagering pools.

As used in this section, “interstate common wagering pool” means a pari-mutuel pool established in one (1) horse racing jurisdiction that is combined with comparable pari-mutuel pools from at least one (1) horse racing jurisdiction for the purpose of establishing payoff prices in the various jurisdictions.

Interstate wagers at a receiving track may form an interstate common wagering pool with wagers at a track in another jurisdiction, and the receiving track may adopt the commission and breakage rates of the track at which the race is being run. The racing commission may also approve types of wagering, distribution of winnings, and rules of racing for interstate common wagering pools that are different from those that normally apply in Kentucky.

Wagers placed on any races run at track in Kentucky may be combined with wagers placed at tracks in other jurisdictions to form an interstate common wagering pool located either within or outside Kentucky.

A track’s participation in an interstate common wagering pool does not cause that track to be considered to be doing business in any jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction where the track is physically located. Excise taxes and commission rates may not be imposed on any interstate common wagering pool other than on amounts actually wagered in Kentucky. The combination of pari-mutuel pools as provided in this section constitutes the communication of wagering information for purposes of calculating odds and payoffs only and does not constitute the transfer of wagers in interstate commerce.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 438, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 191, § 34, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 478, effective July 15, 2010.

230.378.
Wagers at track, at simulcast facility, or through telephone account wagering system — Commission — Tax exemption.

A receiving track may accept wagers only at the track where it is licensed to conduct its race meeting or conduct intertrack wagering. A receiving track may accept wagers through a telephone account wagering system. Wagers at a receiving track, simulcast facility, or on telephone account wagering shall form a common pool with wagers at a host track. This common pool requirement shall not apply to wagers made in connection with interstate simulcasting pursuant to KRS

230.3771

; however, common pools shall be encouraged.

Except as provided in KRS 230.3771(2), the commission of a receiving track, simulcast facility, or on telephone account wagering shall be the same as the commission of the host track as determined in KRS

230.3615

or

230.750

.

In the absence of a valid contract with a horsemen’s organization, the commission of a receiving track, after deduction of applicable taxes and other applicable deductions, shall be split as follows: twenty-two percent (22%) to the host track, twenty-two percent (22%) to the purse program at the host track, twenty-two percent (22%) to the receiving track and twenty-two percent (22%) to the purse program at the receiving track. Twelve percent (12%) of the commission shall be allocated evenly between the host track and the receiving track to cover the cost of simulcasting, unless otherwise agreed to by contract.

The deduction for the backside improvement fund, as provided for in KRS 230.3615(4) shall not apply to the commission or pari-mutuel tax of a receiving track or telephone account wagering.

A receiving track shall be exempt from any license fee imposed by statute or regulation by the racing commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 376, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 159, § 8, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 29, effective March 30, 1992; 1994, ch. 438, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 35, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 479, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 124, § 19, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). In codifying a change to this statute from the 1998 Regular Session, existing references to the former KRS

138.515

have been changed to read KRS

230.3615

under KRS

7.136

(e). In 1992, KRS

138.515

was repealed, reenacted, and amended as KRS

230.3615

. 1992 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 8.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Dunn, Kentucky Division, Horsemen’s Benevolent & Protective Association, Inc. v. Turfway Park Racing Association, Inc.: Controlling the Stakes of Kentucky Horseracing, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 405 (1995).

230.379.
Telephone account wagering — Use of credit card.

A track may engage in telephone account wagering, if all moneys used to place telephone account wagers are on deposit in an amount sufficient to cover the wagers at the track where the account is opened. All moneys wagered by telephone account wagering shall be subject to the applicable pari-mutuel tax levied in KRS

138.510

and shall form a common pool with other pari-mutuel pools at the track for each posted race. The racing commission shall have authority to promulgate necessary and reasonable administrative regulations to regulate the conduct of telephone account wagering, including regulations for the deposit of funds by credit or debit cards or other means of electronic funds transfer.

A track shall accept and tabulate a telephone account wager only from the holder of a telephone wagering account. No person shall directly or indirectly act as an intermediary, transmitter, or agent in the placing of wagers for a holder of a telephone wagering account. No person shall in any manner place a wager through telephone account wagering, on behalf of a holder of a telephone wagering account. Only the holder of a telephone wagering account shall place a telephone wager. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Telephone account wagering conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section shall not be considered a violation of KRS

528.110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 376, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 159, § 9, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 30, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 36, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 480, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Because services provided by a corporation which enables individuals to place bets on horse races from their home telephones or personal computers comply with the requirements of this section and KRS 230.210(17), they do not contravene the prohibition on “messenger betting” contained in KRS

528.110

.

OAG 04-005

.

KRS 230.361(1) should not be construed as prohibiting activities permitted by this section.

OAG 04-005

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Soukup, Rolling the Dice on Precedent and Wagering on Legislation: The Law of Gambling Debt Enforceability in Kentucky after
Kentucky Off-Track Betting, Inc. v. McBurney
and KRS §

372.005

., 95 Ky. L.J. 529 (2006/2007).

230.380.
Simulcast facilities — Restrictions and prohibitions — Tax implications — Percentage of wagers to local economic development — Commissions — Report on money expended.

Any track licensed by the racing commission to conduct horse racing and desiring to establish a simulcast facility shall apply for and may receive approval from the racing commission for each simulcast facility. Prior to considering an application for approval of a simulcast facility, the racing commission shall notify by regular mail, each state senator, state representative, county judge/executive, and mayor in the jurisdiction in which the proposed simulcast facility is located, at least ten (10) days in advance of the racing commission meeting at which the application is to be considered or voted upon. Consideration of an application shall be based on criteria contained in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

230.300

. Approval, if granted, shall be granted for a term of one (1) calendar year.

A track or tracks may proceed with the establishment of a simulcast facility unless, within sixty (60) days of the date on which the racing commission approved the facility, the governing body of the local government jurisdiction in which the facility is to be located votes, by simple majority of those voting, to disapprove the establishment of the simulcast facility. For the purposes of this section, “governing body” means, in an incorporated area, the board of aldermen, city council or board of commissioners; in a county, the fiscal court; in an urban-county government, the urban-county council, or in a charter county, the legislative body created in accordance with KRS

67.825

to

67.875

.

The racing commission shall not approve the establishment of any simulcast facility within a radius of fifty (50) miles of a licensed track. The racing commission may approve the establishment of one (1) simulcast facility within a radius of greater than fifty (50) miles but less than seventy-five (75) miles of a licensed track, but the facility shall not be approved to operate without the prior written consent of the licensed track within whose seventy-five (75) mile radius the facility is located.

The racing commission may promulgate administrative regulations as it deems appropriate to protect the integrity of pari-mutuel wagering at any simulcast facility.

Licensed tracks conducting horse racing may enter into joint agreements to establish or operate one (1) or more simulcast facilities, on terms and conditions as the participating tracks may determine. Any agreements respecting these arrangements shall be filed with the racing commission, and applications for simulcast facilities shall be filed by and licenses may be issued to, these licensed tracks by the racing commission.

A simulcast facility may be established and operated on property that is owned or leased and which is not used solely for the operation of a simulcast facility; provided however, that a simulcast facility may not be established on the premises of a lottery vendor.

A simulcast facility shall not be subject to and shall not pay any excise tax imposed pursuant to KRS

138.510

, or any license tax imposed under KRS

137.170

.

One percent (1%) of all moneys wagered at a simulcast facility shall be dedicated for local economic development and shall be allocated as follows:

If a simulcast facility is located in an incorporated area, seventy-five percent (75%) shall be allocated to the governing body of the city in which the facility is located, and twenty-five percent (25%) to the governing body of the county in which the facility is located.

If a simulcast facility is located in an unincorporated area, all moneys shall be allocated to the governing body of the county or charter county in which the facility is located.

After the deduction of moneys under subsection (8) of this section, simulcast facility shall deduct a commission allowed under KRS

230.3615

with respect to all wagers made at the simulcast facility. The commission, less moneys allocated in subsection (8) of this section, shall be split as follows:

Thirty percent (30%) shall be allocated to the host track;

Forty-six and one-half percent (46.5%) to the purse program at the host track;

Thirteen and one-half percent (13.5%) to be retained by the track or tracks owning the simulcast facility for the purpose of application to expenses incurred in connection therewith;

Six percent (6%) to be allocated to the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders, Inc., to be expended as follows:

Up to three percent (3%) for capital improvements and promotion of off-track betting; and

The remainder for marketing and promoting the Kentucky Thoroughbred industry; and

Four percent (4%) to be allocated to the racing commission to be used for purses at county fairs in Kentucky licensed and approved by the racing commission, and for the standardbred sires stakes program established under KRS

230.770

.

The commission of a simulcast facility derived from interstate wagering shall be reduced by any amounts required to be paid by contract to the host track or track conducting the live race before it is divided as set forth in this section. No simulcast facility may receive any interstate simulcast except with the approval of the live Kentucky host track.

The Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders, Inc., shall annually report to the racing commission on all money expended in accordance with subsection (9)(a)4. of this section. The report shall be in the form required, and provide all information required by the racing commission.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall also apply to the establishment by a track of a noncontiguous facility in a county in which pari-mutuel racing and wagering is not being conducted. Subsection (8) of this section shall also apply to a noncontiguous race track facility referenced in this subsection, unless there is a written agreement to the contrary between the track establishing the facility and the governing body of the local government jurisdiction in which the facility is to be established.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 109, § 2, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 447, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 191, § 37, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 481, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 124, § 20, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). Under KRS 7.136(1)(e), a reference to the former KRS

138.515

in subsection (9)(a) of this statute has been changed to KRS

230.3615

because of 1992 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 8.